Hawaii, session 2025, GM1414.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
SECTION 1. The legislature finds that the payment of state
moneys to a fund established to pay claims related to the
devastating 2023 Maui wildfires, as those claims are compromised
and settled, serves a public purpose and is for the public
health, safety, and general welfare of the State for the
following reasons:
(1) The 2023 Maui wildfires had a devastating impact on
the residents of Maui, resulting in real and personal
property damage, personal injury, wrongful death,
emotional distress and inconvenience, and economic
loss;
(2) Establishing a trust fund to allow the State to
respond with compassion and support for those affected
by the 2023 Maui wildfires, ensuring that victims or
their personal representatives are provided with fair
and just compensation on a timely basis, is in the
public interest;
2025-3316 HBIOOI CDl HMSO 1
IHlillliliHlillllVIl

Page 2 H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
(3) Contributing state funds to be used along with
contributions from others, including the county of
Maui, Hawaiian Electric, Kamehameha Schools, Charter
Communications/Spectrum, Hawaiian Telcom, and West
Maui Land Company, for the compromise and settlement
of claims against the State and others related to the
2023 Maui wildfires to compensate those who have
suffered real and personal property damage, personal
injury, wrongful death, emotional distress and
inconvenience, or economic loss in the 2023 Maui
wildfires is in the public interest;
(4) Settling claims related to the 2023 Maui wildfires is
an efficient mechanism to address the urgent and
exceptional situation caused by the 2023 Maui
wildfires, and will offer a unique ability to help
those in need;
(5) The complexity and challenges of tort litigation,
including the length of time needed to resolve
lawsuits, make it prudent to provide an alternative to
litigation through the State's contribution to the
Maui wildfires settlement agreements that will allow
2025-3316 HBIOOI CDl HMSO 2
iiiiiMiiiiiHiniii

Page 3 H.B. NO. --
C.D. 1
for the early compromise and settlement of claims and
expedite the compensation process for those impacted
by the 2023 Maui wildfires;
(6) It is in the public interest to encourage swift and
fair resolution to claims arising from the 2023 Maui
wildfires, thus alleviating the burden on the judicial
system and fostering community support, unity, and
recovery in the aftermath of the 2023 Maui wildfires;
and
(7) Individuals receiving compensation pursuant to the
Maui wildfires settlement agreements shall release the
State and other parties that contribute to the Maui
wildfires settlement agreements from further liability
and shall voluntarily waive their rights to pursue
damages through litigation for real and personal
property damage, personal injury, wrongful death,
emotional distress and inconvenience, and economic
loss, contributing to a more efficient resolution
process.
The legislature further finds that the Maui wildfires
settlement agreements reached in November 2024 aim to resolve
2025-3316 HBIOOI CDl HMSO

Page 4 H.B. NO. ™-
C.D. 1
lawsuits related to the 2023 Maui wildfires. Under the proposed
terms of the Maui wildfires settlement agreements, the seven
defendants - the State of Hawaii, county of Maui, Hawaiian
Electric, Kamehameha Schools, Charter Communications/Spectrum,
Hawaiian Telcom, and West Maui Land Company - collectively
agreed to pay $4,037,000,000 to provide compensation to the
approximately two thousand two hundred affected parties who
filed lawsuits. The State's contribution is approximately
$807,500,000, to be paid over four years. The State's
settlement amount is in addition to the State's $65,000,000
contribution to the One Ohana Fund for wildfire assistance.
The allocation of funds and the determination of individual
compensation amounts have yet to be finalized.
Further, the Hawaii supreme court recently decided in In re
Petition for the Coordination of Maui Fire Cases that property
and casualty insurance companies may only recover payments made
to policyholders for 2023 Maui wildfire damages using a
statutory lien. This limitation on the subrogation remedies
available to insurers allows the settlement to proceed as
planned.
2025-3316 HBIOOI CDl HMSO
iiiBiiminiiiiiiiiiin

Page 5
H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
Consequently, the legislature finds that authorizing the
expenditure of public moneys as the State's payment to the
compromise and settlement of claims arising from the 2023 Maui
wildfires will provide a means of compensation to any individual
or personal representative of a deceased individual who suffered
real and personal property damage, personal injury, wrongful
death, emotional distress and inconvenience, or economic loss as
a result of the 2023 Maui wildfires, and will offer a timely and
compassionate resolution to those affected by the Maui wildfires
while relieving the burden on the judicial system and
contributing to the rebuilding of lives and community. The
State's contribution to the settlement of claims will be
distributed pursuant to the Maui wildfires settlement
agreements.
Further, the legislature finds that the Maui wildfires
settlement trust fund is recognized as a trust fund, where the
claimants of the Maui wildfires settlement hold a vested
beneficial interest that was established by a legislative
appropriation that restricts the use of the trust fund
exclusively for settling claims arising from the 2023 Maui
wildfires and covering its administrative costs.
2025-3316 HBIOOI CDl HMSO :

Page 6 H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to:
(1) Establish the Maui wildfires settlement trust fund to
be administered by the attorney general; and
(2) Appropriate funds to fund the settlement of claims
related to the 2023 Maui wildfires.
SECTION 2. Chapter 28, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended
by adding a new section to part I to be appropriately designated
and to read as follows:
"§2 8- Maui wildfires settlement trust fun^ (a) There
shall be established in the state treasury the Maui wildfires
settlement trust fund, which shall be administered by the
attorney general, and into which shall be deposited:
(1) Appropriations made by the legislature to the trust
fund;
(2) All interest accruing from the investment of moneys in
the trust fund; and
(3) Loans made to the trust fund.
(b) Moneys in the Maui wildfires settlement trust fund
shall be used for the following purposes:
(1) Payment of eligible claims pursuant to the Maui
wildfires settlement agreements; and
2025-3316 HBIOOI CDl HMSO

Page 7 H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
(2) Payment of administrative costs relating to the Maui
wildfires settlement agreements.
(c) The Maui wildfires settlement trust fund shall be
terminated upon payment of all claims and costs relating to
settlement of claims under the Maui wildfires settlement
agreements. Upon termination, moneys in the trust fund shall
revert back to the State and shall lapse to the general fund;
provided that any moneys advanced to the trust fund as a loan
shall be repaid without interest.
(d) The director of finance may loan moneys to the Maui
wildfires settlement trust fund from the general, special, or
revolving funds of the State that, in the director of finance's
judgment, are in excess of the amounts necessary for the State's
requirements and will not impede or hamper the necessary
financial operations of the State. The loans shall be without
interest. All loans shall be repaid upon demand of the director
of finance.
(e) Upon approval of the governor, the attorney general
may expend up to the balance in the trust fund for costs as
authorized by this section.
2025-3316 HBIOOI GDI HMSO
IDIIIHIinilllilllllilW

Page 8 H.B. NO. 1001
H.D. 1
S.D. 3
C.D, 1
(f) Any individual who receives compensation from the Maui
wildfires settlement trust fund under this section shall execute
a release that releases the State from any and all liabilities
arising out of the Maui wildfires.
(g) The department of the attorney general shall submit a
report to the legislature no later than thirty days prior to the
convening of each regular session that shall include their
receipts and disbursements of the Maui wildfires settlement
trust fund for the prior fiscal year.”
SECTION 3. There is appropriated out of the general
revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $400,000,000 or so
much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 and
the sum of $407,500,000 or so much thereof as may be necessary
for fiscal year 2026-2027 to be deposited into the Maui
wildfires settlement trust fund to fund the State's contribution
to the settlement of claims related to the 2023 Maui wildfires
I
and for the payment of administrative expenses relating to the
Maui wildfires settlement agreements.
The sums appropriated shall be expended by the department
of the attorney general for the purposes of this Act.
SECTION 4. New statutory material is underscored.
2025-3316 HBIOOI CDl HMSO j
liiinniiiiiiiniiiiiiiiii

Page 9 H.B. NO 1001
I
w
O
b
o
b
SECTION 5. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
2025-3316 HBIOOI CD! HMSO 9
■■lillMHIlilH

1001
H.B. NO.
i
w
d
Q
Q
Q
APPROVED this sth day of July , 2025
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF HAWAII

HB No. 1001, HD 1, SD 3, CD 1
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date: April 30, 2025
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Final Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of2025.
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives

H.B. No. 1001, H.D. 1, S.D. 3, C.D. 1
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAWAI‘I
Date: April 30, 2025
Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Final Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2025.
Clerk of the Senate
249